North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-02.1 North Dakota Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act
19-02.1-14.1.
Definitions — Label of prescription drugs — Selecting and dispensing generic name drugs — Identification of prescription drugs.

As used in this section, unless the subject matter or context otherwise requires:

“Brand name” means the registered trademark name given to a drug or medicine by its manufacturer, labeler, or distributor.

“Code imprint” means a series of letters or numbers assigned by the manufacturer or distributor to a specific drug, or marks or monograms unique to the manufacturer or distributor of the drug, or both.

“Distributor” means a person who distributes for resale a drug in solid dosage form under that person’s own label even though that person is not the actual manufacturer of the drug.

“Generic name” means the established name or official chemical name of the drug, drug product, or medicine.

“Prescription drug” means a drug defined by section 503(b) of the federal Act and under which definition its label is required to bear the statement “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription” or “Rx Only”.

“Solid dosage form” means capsules or tablets intended for oral use.

“Therapeutically equivalent” means a generic name drug product that would elicit the same therapeutic response from the same person as a brand name drug product.

Drugs or medicines dispensed pursuant to a prescription must bear a label permanently affixed to the immediate container in which the drug or medicine is dispensed or delivered and which is received by the purchaser or patient. The label must bear the brand name or the generic name, strength, quantity, serial number, date of dispensing, patient name, and directions for use of the drug or medicine, except when the physician or other health care provider authorized by law to prescribe drugs or medicine has notified the pharmacist that the appearance of the name on the label would be alarming to or detrimental to the well-being of the purchaser of the prescription.

If a practitioner prescribes a drug by its brand name, the pharmacist may exercise professional judgment in the economic interest of the patient by selecting a drug product with the same generic name and demonstrated therapeutical equivalency as the one prescribed for dispensing and sale to the patient unless the practitioner specifically indicates in the practitioner’s own handwriting “brand medically necessary” on a written prescription or expressly indicates that an oral prescription is to be dispensed as communicated. If the prescription is created electronically by the prescriber, the required legend must appear on the practitioner’s screen. The practitioner must take a specific overt action to include the “brand medically necessary” language with the electronic transmission. The pharmacist shall note the instructions on the file copy of the prescription, or maintain the digital record as transmitted if it is an electronic prescription. A reminder legend must be placed on all prescription forms or appear on the computer screen of the electronic prescribing system. The legend must state “In order to require that a brand name product be dispensed, the practitioner must handwrite the words ‘brand medically necessary’.”. The legend printed on the prescription form or appearing on the prescriber’s computer screen must be in at least six-point uppercase print or font. The pharmacist may not substitute a generic name drug product unless its price to the purchaser is less than the price of the prescribed drug product. In addition, a pharmacist may not substitute drug products in the following dosage forms: enteric coated tablets, controlled release products, injectable suspensions other than antibiotics, suppositories containing active ingredients for which systemic absorption is necessary for therapeutic activity, and different delivery systems for aerosol and nebulizer drugs. In the event that any drug listed above is, subsequent to January 1, 1982, determined to be therapeutically equivalent, then the previously mentioned substitution ban is automatically removed for that drug. The pharmacist shall inform the person receiving the drug when a prescription for a brand name drug product does not require that the prescribed drug be dispensed and of the person’s right to refuse a generic name drug product selected by the pharmacist. The pharmacy file copy of every prescription must include the brand name, if any, or the name of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor of the generic name drug dispensed. A pharmacist who selects and dispenses a therapeutically equivalent generic name drug product shall assume no greater liability for selecting the dispensed drug product than would be incurred in filling a prescription for a drug product prescribed by its generic name. The practitioner is not liable for the substitution made by a pharmacist.

In the case of a prescription for which a maximum allowable cost program for purposes of reimbursement has been established under title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, the following also apply:

If the practitioner has instructed the pharmacist to dispense as written, the words “brand medically necessary” must also be written on the prescription in the practitioner’s own handwriting, or appear as part of the electronic prescription as noted in subsection 3. The pharmacist may dispense a therapeutically equivalent generic name drug product if this handwritten or electronic instruction does not appear on the prescription.

If the pharmacist is instructed orally to dispense a brand name drug as prescribed, the pharmacist shall reduce the prescription to writing and shall note the instructions on the file copy of the prescription.

If the practitioner has not instructed the pharmacist to dispense a brand name drug or medicine and the patient specifically requests a brand name drug or medicine, the patient shall pay the difference between the price to the patient of the brand name drug or medicine and the therapeutically equivalent generic name drug or medicine if the price of the brand name drug or medicine is higher.

A pharmacist may not select and dispense a different drug product for a prescribed drug product unless it has been manufactured with the following minimum manufacturing standards and practices by a manufacturer who:

Marks capsules and tablets with identification code or monogram.

Labels products with their expiration date.

Provides reasonable services to accept return goods that have reached their expiration date.

Provides the pharmacist with information from which it can be determined whether a drug product is therapeutically equivalent.

Maintains recall capabilities for unsafe or defective drugs.

No prescription drug in solid dosage form may be manufactured or distributed in this state unless it is clearly marked or imprinted with a code imprint identifying the drug and the manufacturer or distributor of the drug.

All manufacturers and distributors of prescription drugs in solid dosage form shall provide to the department or state board of pharmacy, upon request, a listing of all such prescription drugs identifying by code imprint the manufacturer and the specific type of drug. The listing must at all times be kept current by all manufacturers and distributors subject to the provisions of this section.

The state board of pharmacy may grant exemptions from the requirements of this section upon application by any drug manufacturer or distributor which shows size, physical characteristics, or other unique characteristics of a drug that render the use of a code imprint on the drug impracticable or impossible. Any exemption granted by the state board of pharmacy must be included by the manufacturer or distributor in the listing required by this section. The listing must describe the physical characteristics and type of drug to which the exemption relates.

All prescription drugs in solid dosage form that are possessed, distributed, sold, or offered for sale in violation of the provisions of this section must be deemed misbranded and must be seized by the department or state board of pharmacy.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 193, § 1; 1979, ch. 285, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 250, § 1; 1985, ch. 260, § 1; 1985, ch. 261, § 1; 1989, ch. 3, § 8; 1989, ch. 265, § 1; 1993, ch. 219, § 1; 2001, ch. 213, § 1; 2011, ch. 160, § 1.

Cross Reference.

Federal Social Security Act, title XIX, see 42 USCS § 1396 et seq.

Collateral References.

Liability of pharmacist who accurately fills prescription for harm resulting to user, 44 A.L.R.5th 393.

19-02.1-14.2.
Maximum allowable cost lists for pharmaceuticals — Pharmacy benefits managers — Penalty.

For the purposes of this section:

“Determination” means a decision that settles and ends a controversy or the resolution of a question through appeal.

“Maximum allowable cost price” means a maximum reimbursement amount for a group of therapeutically equivalent and pharmaceutically equivalent multiple source drugs.

“Multiple source drug” means a therapeutically equivalent drug that is available from at least two manufacturers.

“Pharmacy benefits manager” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

With respect to each contract between a pharmacy benefits manager and a pharmacy, each pharmacy benefits manager shall:

Provide to the pharmacy, at the beginning of each contract and contract renewal, the sources utilized to determine the maximum allowable cost pricing of the pharmacy benefits manager.

Update any maximum allowable cost price list at least every seven business days, and provide prompt notification of the pricing changes to network pharmacies.

Disclose the sources utilized for setting maximum allowable cost price rates on each maximum allowable cost price list included under the contract and identify each maximum allowable cost price list that applies to the contracted pharmacy. A pharmacy benefits manager shall make the list of the maximum allowable costs available to a contracted pharmacy in a format that is readily accessible and usable to the contracted pharmacy.

Ensure maximum allowable cost prices are not set below sources utilized by the pharmacy benefits manager.

Provide a reasonable administrative appeals procedure to allow a dispensing pharmacy provider to contest a listed maximum allowable price rate. The pharmacy benefits manager shall provide a determination to a provider that has contested a maximum allowable price rate within seven business days. If an update to the maximum allowable price rate for an appealed drug is warranted, the pharmacy benefits manager shall make the change based on the date of the determination and make the adjustment effective for all similarly situated pharmacy providers in this state within the network.

Ensure dispensing fees are not included in the calculation of maximum allowable cost price reimbursement to pharmacy providers.

A pharmacy benefits manager may not place a prescription drug on a maximum allowable price list unless:

The drug has at least two nationally available, therapeutically equivalent, multiple source drugs or a generic drug is available only from one manufacturer;

The drug is listed as therapeutically equivalent and pharmaceutically equivalent or “A” or “B” rated in the United States food and drug administration’s most recent version of the “Orange Book” or the drug is “Z” rated; and

The drug is generally available for purchase by pharmacies in the state from national or regional wholesalers and not obsolete.

This section does not apply to state Medicaid programs.

A pharmacy benefits manager that violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 180, § 1.

19-02.1-14.3.
Biosimilar biological products.

In this section:

“Biological product”, “biosimilar”, “interchangeable”, “interchangeable biological product”, “license”, and “reference product” mean the same as these terms mean under section 351 of the federal Public Health Service Act [42 U.S.C. 262].

“Prescription” means a product that is subject to section 503(b) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 353(b)].

A pharmacy may not substitute a prescription biosimilar product for a prescribed product unless each of the following requirements is met:

The biosimilar product has been determined by the United States food and drug administration to be interchangeable with the prescribed product.

The prescribing practitioner does not specifically indicate in the practitioner’s own handwriting “brand medically necessary” on a written prescription, does not expressly indicate that an oral prescription is to be dispensed as communicated, or has not taken a specific overt action to include the “brand medically necessary” language with an electronically transmitted prescription.

The pharmacist or the pharmacist’s designee informs the individual receiving the biological product that the biological product may be substituted with a biosimilar product and that the individual has a right to refuse the biosimilar product selected by the pharmacist and the individual chooses not to refuse.

Within two business days following the dispensing of the biosimilar product, the pharmacist or the pharmacist’s designee notifies the prescribing practitioner of the substitution. Notification under this subdivision must include the name of the substitution product and the name of the manufacturer, and may be made using facsimile, telephone, electronic transmission, an entry into an interoperable electronic medical record accessible by the prescribing practitioner, or other prevailing means accessible by the prescribing practitioner.

The pharmacy and the prescribing practitioner retain a record of the interchangeable biosimilar substitution for a period of no less than five years.

Subsection 2 does not apply to a biologic product refill prescription that is not changed from the interchangeable biosimilar substitution dispensed on the previous filling of the prescription.

The board of pharmacy shall maintain on the board’s public website a current list, or an internet link to a United States food and drug administration-approved list, of biosimilar biological products determined to be interchangeable under subdivision a of subsection 2.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 181, § 1; 2021, ch. 170, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

19-02.1-15.
Drugs limited to dispensing on prescription.

Except as authorized and provided in chapter 19-03.1, a depressant, stimulant, or hallucinogenic drug; or a drug intended for use by man which is a habit-forming drug to which subsection 4 of section 19-02.1-14 applies; or a drug that, because of its toxicity or other potentiality for harmful effect, or the method of its use, or the collateral measures necessary to its use, is not safe for use except under the supervision of a practitioner; or a drug limited by an approved application under section 505 of the federal act or section 19-02.1-16 to use under the professional supervision of a practitioner, must be dispensed by prescription of a practitioner, and such prescription may not be filled or refilled after one year from the date on which such prescription was issued; except that nothing herein may be construed as preventing a practitioner from issuing a new prescription for the same drug either in writing or orally. Any oral prescription for such drug must be promptly reduced to writing and filed by the pharmacist.

Any drug dispensed by filling or refilling a written or oral prescription of a practitioner licensed by law to administer such drug is exempt from the requirements of section 19-02.1-14, except subsection 1, subdivisions b and c of subsection 10, subsections 12 and 13, and the packaging requirements of subsections 8 and 9 of section 19-02.1-14, if the drug bears a label containing the name and address of the dispenser, the serial number and date of the prescription or of its filling, the name of the prescriber and, if stated in the prescription, the name of the patient, and the directions for use and cautionary statements, if any, contained in such prescription. This exemption does not apply to any drug dispensed in the course of the conduct of a business of dispensing drugs pursuant to diagnosis by mail or electronic means, or to a drug dispensed in violation of subsection 1.

The department may, by regulation, remove drugs subject to subsection 4 of section 19-02.1-14 and section 19-02.1-16 from the requirements of subsection 1 when such requirements are not necessary for the protection of the public health. Drugs removed from the prescription requirements of the federal act by regulations issued thereunder may also, by regulations issued by the department, be removed from the requirements of subsection 1.

A drug which is subject to subsection 1 must be deemed to be misbranded if at any time prior to dispensing its label fails to bear the statement “Caution: Federal Law Prohibits Dispensing Without Prescription”, “Rx Only”, or “Caution: State Law Prohibits Dispensing Without Prescription”. A drug to which subsection 1 does not apply must be deemed to be misbranded if at any time prior to dispensing its label bears the caution statement quoted in the preceding sentence.

Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve any person from any requirement prescribed by or under authority of law with respect to drugs now included or which may hereafter be included within the classifications of narcotic drugs or marijuana as defined in the applicable federal and state laws relating to narcotic drugs and marijuana.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 16; 1969, ch. 230, § 6; 1971, ch. 235, § 47; 1979, ch. 286, § 1; 2001, ch. 213, § 2; 2009, ch. 198, § 2.

Cross-References.

Drugs, only registered pharmacist or licensed physician may sell and dispense, see N.D.C.C. §§ 43-15-14, 43-15-32.

19-02.1-15.1.
Requirements for dispensing controlled substances and specified drugs — Penalty.

As used in this section:

“Controlled substance” has the meaning set forth in section 19-03.1-01.

“Deliver, distribute, or dispense by means of the internet” refers, respectively, to delivery, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance or specified drug that is caused or facilitated by means of the internet.

“In-person medical evaluation” means a medical evaluation that is conducted with the patient in the physical presence of the practitioner, without regard to whether portions of the evaluation are conducted by other practitioners, and must include one of the following actions:

The prescribing practitioner examines the patient at the time the prescription or drug order is issued;

The prescribing practitioner has performed a prior examination of the patient within twelve months;

Another prescribing practitioner practicing within the same health system, group, or clinic as the prescribing practitioner has examined the patient within twelve months;

A consulting practitioner to whom the prescribing practitioner has referred the patient has examined the patient within twelve months; or

The referring practitioner has performed an examination in the case of a consultant practitioner issuing a prescription or drug order when providing services by means of telemedicine.

“Internet” and “practice of telemedicine” have the meanings set forth in the Ryan Haight Online Pharmacy Consumer Protection Act of 2008 [Pub. L. 110-425; 21 U.S.C. 802-803].

“Specified drugs” mean:

A skeletal muscle relaxant containing carisoprodol, chlorphenesin, chlorzoxazone, metaxalone, or methocarbamol;

A centrally acting analgesic with opioid activity such as tapentadol or tramadol;

A drug containing butalbital; and

Phosphodiesterase type 5 inhibitors when used to treat erectile dysfunction.

“Valid prescription” means a prescription that is issued for a legitimate medical purpose in the usual course of professional practice by a practitioner who has conducted an in-person medical evaluation of the patient.

A controlled substance or specified drug may not be delivered, distributed, or dispensed without a valid prescription. It is also unlawful for a person to knowingly or intentionally aid or abet in these activities. An example of such an activity includes knowingly or intentionally serving as an agent, intermediary, or other entity that causes the internet to be used to bring together a buyer and seller to engage in the dispensing of a controlled substance or specified drug.

This section applies to the delivery, distribution, and dispensing of a controlled substance or specified drug by means of the internet or any other electronic means from a location whether within or outside this state to a person or an address in this state.

Nothing in this section may be construed:

To apply to the delivery, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance or specified drug by a practitioner engaged in the practice of telemedicine in accordance with applicable federal and state laws;

To prohibit or limit the use of electronic prescriptions for a controlled substance or any other drug;

To prohibit a physician from prescribing a controlled substance or specified drug through the use of a guideline or protocol established with an allied health professional, resident, or medical student under the direction and supervision of the physician;

To prohibit a practitioner from issuing a prescription or dispensing a controlled substance or specified drug in accordance with administrative rules adopted by a state agency authorizing expedited partner therapy in the management of a sexually transmitted disease; or

To limit prescription, administration, or dispensing of a controlled substance or specified drug through a distribution mechanism approved by the state health officer in order to prevent, mitigate, or treat a pandemic illness, infectious disease outbreak, or intentional or accidental release of a biological, chemical, or radiological agent.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 198, § 1; 2013, ch. 182, § 1.

19-02.1-16.
New drugs. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

No person may sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold for sale, or give away any new drug unless:

An application with respect thereto has been approved and said approval has not been withdrawn under section 505 of the federal act; or

When not subject to the federal act, unless such drug has been tested and has been found to be safe for use and effective in use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof, and prior to selling or offering for sale such drug, there has been filed with the department an application setting forth:

Full reports of investigations which have been made to show whether or not such drug is safe for use and whether such drug is effective in use.

A full list of the articles used as components of such drug.

A full statement of the composition of such drug.

A full description of the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture, processing, and packing of such drugs.

Such samples of such drug and of the articles used as components thereof as the department may require.

Specimens of the labeling proposed to be used for such drug.

An application provided for in subdivision b of subsection 1 becomes effective on the one hundred eightieth day after the filing thereof, except that if the department finds, after due notice to the applicant and giving the applicant an opportunity for a hearing, that the drug is not safe or not effective for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the proposed labeling thereof, the state department of health shall, prior to the effective date of the application, issue an order refusing to permit the application to become effective.

An order refusing to permit an application under this section to become effective may be revoked by the department.

This section does not apply:

To a drug intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety and effectiveness of drugs, provided the drug is plainly labeled in compliance with regulations issued by the department or pursuant to section 505(i) or 507(d) of the federal act;

To a drug sold in this state at any time prior to the enactment of this chapter or introduced into interstate commerce at any time prior to the enactment of the federal act;

To any drug which is licensed under the Virus, Serum, and Toxin Act of July 1, 1902, U.S.C. 1958 ed. Title 42 Chapter 6A Sec. 262; or

To any drug which is subject to subsection 5 of section 19-02.1-14.

The provisions of subsection 16 of section 19-02.1-01 do not apply to any drug which, on October 9, 1962, or on the date immediately preceding the enactment of this subsection:

Was commercially sold or used in this state or in the United States;

Was not a new drug as defined by subsection 16 of section 19-02.1-01 as then in force; and

Was not covered by an effective application under section 19-02.1-16 or under section 505 of the federal act, when such drug is intended solely for use under conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in labeling with respect to such drug.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 17; 1985, ch. 258, § 15; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

19-02.1-16.
New drugs. [Effective September 1, 2022]

No person may sell, deliver, offer for sale, hold for sale, or give away any new drug unless:

An application with respect thereto has been approved and said approval has not been withdrawn under section 505 of the federal act; or

When not subject to the federal act, unless such drug has been tested and has been found to be safe for use and effective in use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof, and prior to selling or offering for sale such drug, there has been filed with the department an application setting forth:

Full reports of investigations which have been made to show whether or not such drug is safe for use and whether such drug is effective in use.

A full list of the articles used as components of such drug.

A full statement of the composition of such drug.

A full description of the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture, processing, and packing of such drugs.

Such samples of such drug and of the articles used as components thereof as the department may require.

Specimens of the labeling proposed to be used for such drug.

An application provided for in subdivision b of subsection 1 becomes effective on the one hundred eightieth day after the filing thereof, except that if the department finds, after due notice to the applicant and giving the applicant an opportunity for a hearing, that the drug is not safe or not effective for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the proposed labeling thereof, the department shall, prior to the effective date of the application, issue an order refusing to permit the application to become effective.

An order refusing to permit an application under this section to become effective may be revoked by the department.

This section does not apply:

To a drug intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by scientific training and experience to investigate the safety and effectiveness of drugs, provided the drug is plainly labeled in compliance with regulations issued by the department or pursuant to section 505(i) or 507(d) of the federal act;

To a drug sold in this state at any time prior to the enactment of this chapter or introduced into interstate commerce at any time prior to the enactment of the federal act;

To any drug which is licensed under the Virus, Serum, and Toxin Act of July 1, 1902, U.S.C. 1958 ed. Title 42 Chapter 6A Sec. 262; or

To any drug which is subject to subsection 5 of section 19-02.1-14.

The provisions of subsection 16 of section 19-02.1-01 do not apply to any drug which, on October 9, 1962, or on the date immediately preceding the enactment of this subsection:

Was commercially sold or used in this state or in the United States;

Was not a new drug as defined by subsection 16 of section 19-02.1-01 as then in force; and

Was not covered by an effective application under section 19-02.1-16 or under section 505 of the federal act, when such drug is intended solely for use under conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in labeling with respect to such drug.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 17; 1985, ch. 258, § 15; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 84, effective September 1, 2022.

19-02.1-16.1.
Pharmacy claim fees and pharmacy rights — Pharmacy benefits managers — Penalty.

As used in this section:

“Pharmacy benefits manager” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

“Plan sponsor” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

“Third-party payer” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

A pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not directly or indirectly charge or hold a pharmacy responsible for a fee related to a claim:

That is not apparent at the time of claim processing;

That is not reported on the remittance advice of an adjudicated claim; or

After the initial claim is adjudicated at the point of sale.

Pharmacy performance measures or pay for performance pharmacy networks shall utilize the electronic quality improvement platform for plans and pharmacies or other unbiased nationally recognized entity aiding in improving pharmacy performance measures.

A pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not collect a fee from a pharmacy if the pharmacy’s performance scores or metrics fall within the criteria identified by the electronic quality improvement platform for plans and pharmacies or other unbiased nationally recognized entity aiding in improving pharmacy performance measures.

If a pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer imposes a fee upon a pharmacy for scores or metrics or both scores and metrics that do not meet those established by the electronic quality improvement platform for plans and pharmacies or other nationally recognized entity aiding in improving pharmacy performance measures, a pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer is limited to applying the fee to the professional dispensing fee outlined in the pharmacy contract.

A pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not impose a fee relating to performance metrics on the cost of goods sold by a pharmacy.

A pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not charge a patient a copayment that exceeds the cost of the medication. If a patient pays a copayment, the dispensing provider or pharmacy shall retain the adjudicated cost and the pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not redact the adjudicated cost.

A pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from participating in a class action lawsuit. A pharmacy or pharmacist may disclose to the plan sponsor or to the patient information regarding the adjudicated reimbursement paid to the pharmacy which is compliant under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 [Pub. L. 104-191; 110 Stat. 1936; 29 U.S.C. 1181 et seq.].

A pharmacist or pharmacy that belongs to a pharmacy service administration organization may receive a copy of a contract the pharmacy service administration organization entered with a pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer on the pharmacy’s or pharmacist’s behalf.

A pharmacy or pharmacist may provide relevant information to a patient if the patient is acquiring prescription drugs. This information may include the cost and clinical efficacy of a more affordable alternative drug if one is available. Gag orders of such a nature placed on a pharmacy or pharmacist are prohibited.

A pharmacy or pharmacist may mail or deliver drugs to a patient as an ancillary service of a pharmacy.

A pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from charging a shipping and handling fee to a patient requesting a prescription be mailed or delivered.

Upon request, a pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer shall provide a pharmacy or pharmacist with the processor control number, bank identification number, and group number for each pharmacy network established or administered by a pharmacy benefits manager to enable the pharmacy to make an informed contracting decision.

A pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not require pharmacy accreditation standards or recertification requirements inconsistent with, more stringent than, or in addition to federal and state requirements for licensure as a pharmacy in this state.

A pharmacy benefits manager or other third-party payer that violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor per violation occurrence.

History.

S.L. 2017, ch. 161, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 161, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to contracts and agreements in effect on and after the effective date of this Act.”

19-02.1-16.2.
Specialty pharmacy services and patient access to pharmaceuticals — Pharmacy benefits managers — Penalty.

As used in this section:

“Pharmacy benefits manager” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

“Plan sponsor” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

“Specialty drug” means a prescription drug that:

Is not available for order or purchase by a retail community pharmacy and long-term care pharmacy, regardless of whether the drug is meant to be self-administered; and

Requires special storage and has distribution or inventory limitations not available at a retail community pharmacy or long-term care pharmacy.

“Third-party payer” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

If requested by a plan sponsor contracted payer, a pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer that has an ownership interest, either directly or through an affiliate or subsidiary, in a pharmacy shall disclose to the plan sponsor contracted payer any difference between the amount paid to a pharmacy and the amount charged to the plan sponsor contracted payer.

A pharmacy benefits manager or a pharmacy benefits manager’s affiliates or subsidiaries may not own or have an ownership interest in a patient assistance program and a mail order specialty pharmacy, unless the pharmacy benefits manager, affiliate, or subsidiary agrees to not participate in a transaction that benefits the pharmacy benefits manager, affiliate, or subsidiary instead of another person owed a fiduciary duty.

A pharmacy benefits manager or third-party payer may not require pharmacy accreditation standards or recertification requirements to participate in a network which are inconsistent with, more stringent than, or in addition to the federal and state requirements for licensure as a pharmacy in this state.

A licensed pharmacy or pharmacist may dispense any and all drugs allowed under that license.

A pharmacy benefits manager or other third-party payer that violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for each violation occurrence.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 162, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 162, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to contracts and agreements in effect on and after the effective date of this Act.”

19-02.1-16.3.
Pharmacy benefits managers — Step therapy protocols — Limitations.

As used in this section:

“Metastatic cancer” means cancer that has spread from the primary or original site to lymph nodes, nearby tissues, or other parts of the body.

“Pharmacy benefits manager” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

“Step therapy protocol” means a protocol requiring an individual use a drug, or sequence of drugs, other than the prescription drug, or sequence of prescription drugs, the individual’s health care provider recommends for the individual’s treatment, before the pharmacy benefits manager or health plan allows coverage for the recommended prescription drug, or sequence of prescription drugs.

A pharmacy benefits manager or a health plan may not require a step therapy protocol for coverage of a recommended prescription drug, or sequence of prescription drugs, approved by the United States food and drug administration if:

The recommended prescription drug, or sequence of prescription drugs, is prescribed to treat the individual’s diagnosis of metastatic cancer; and

The use of the recommended prescription drug, or sequence of prescription drugs, is consistent with the United States food and drug administration-approved indications or is supported by peer-reviewed medical literature.

This section does not require coverage of a nonformulary prescription drug.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 183, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

19-02.1-16.4
Mail order and home delivery — Prior consent — Refund.

If a pharmacy offers a prescription through home delivery or mail order delivery services, the pharmacy may not initiate delivery of a refill unless:

The pharmacy obtains prior consent from the patient or the patient’s authorized representative; or

The pharmacy provides the patient with notice of the upcoming delivery through more than one communication attempt, by different means, and the patient or the patient’s authorized representative does not respond indicating the patient does not want the refill.

If a pharmacy delivers a refill in violation of subsection 1:

Within thirty days of the patient’s or the patient’s authorized representative’s notification of the pharmacy of the unwanted refill, the pharmacy shall refund all payments received by the pharmacy relating to the unwanted refill.

Within thirty days of the pharmacy’s, patient’s, or patient’s authorized representative’s notification of the health plan or the pharmacy benefits manager of the unwanted refill, the health plan and pharmacy benefits manager shall refund all payments received relating to the unwanted refill.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 184, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

19-02.1-16.5.
Pharmacy benefits managers — Prohibition on discrimination — Penalty.

As used in this section:

“Pharmacy” means a pharmacy licensed under the laws of this state.

“Pharmacy benefits manager” has the same meaning as in section 19-03.6-01.

A pharmacy benefits manager may not discriminate against or interfere with a covered entity participating under section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act [42 U.S.C. 201 et seq.] or a pharmacy under contract with a covered entity under section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act to provide pharmacy services on behalf of the covered entity. This includes refusing to contract with a pharmacy.

A pharmacy benefits manager may not modify, by contract, provider manual, or other means, the definition of pharmacy as defined in this section, reimburse a lower dollar amount for a drug purchased under section 340B than if the drug had been purchased outside sections 340B, or interfere with any section 340B pharmacy service between the covered entity and the contracted pharmacy.

A pharmacy benefits manager may not directly or indirectly, on behalf of a pharmacy benefits manager, a carrier, or a health plan, charge or hold a pharmacy responsible for a fee for any step, component, or mechanism related to the claims adjudication processing network.

Contract and claim information between the covered entity and contracted pharmacy is confidential.

A pharmacy benefits manager that violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for each violation occurrence.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 22, 2021.